California statutes. Harbors and Navigation Code
It has exclusive jurisdiction over, and it may provide for and supervise pilots and the pilotage of sea-going vessels from the end of jurisdiction of existing pilot authorities to points lying upon any navigable waterway project of the United States, entering the district.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

6300.

It may contribute money to the Federal or the State Government or to the county in which it is located or to any city within the district, for the purpose of defraying the whole or a portion of the cost and expenses of work and improvement to be performed, either within or without the territorial limits of the district, by the Federal, State, county or city government, in improving rivers, streams, or in doing other work, when such work will improve navigation and commerce, in or to the navigable waters in the district.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

6301.

A district may do any work or make any improvement within or without the territorial limits of the district, which will aid in the development or the improvement of navigation or commerce to or within the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 195, Sec. 19.)
-------------------------------------------

6302.

A district may enact necessary police regulations providing for control of any waterway project of the United States, entering the district, and adopt rules and regulations concerning the construction of wharves, docks, buildings, and improvements of all types, contemplated.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 195, Sec. 20.)
-------------------------------------------

6302.5.

(a) This section is applicable only within the Santa Cruz Port District. The Legislature finds and declares that this section is necessary to meet a serious danger to the public safety within the Santa Cruz Port District caused by surfriding activities within the harbor entrance area.

(b) No person shall swim or surfride, or use any watercraft or device to surfride, on ocean waters within a harbor entrance area, as prescribed by the Santa Cruz Port District by ordinance.

(c) For the purposes of this section, “surfride” includes traveling to or from a surfriding staging area and activities in the staging area which are preparatory or preliminary to, or connected with, riding the surf.

(d) Every person who violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor, and shall be punished by a fine not to exceed five hundred dollars ($500).

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 407, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

6303.

A district may provide for the opening and laying out of streets leading to the waterfront.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 195, Sec. 21.)
-------------------------------------------

6304.

A district may regulate and control the construction, maintenance, and operation or use of all wharves, warehouses, structures, improvements, or appliances used in connection with or for the accommodation and promotion of transportation or navigation on any improvement project of the federal government applying to the main waterway entering the district and on other navigable streams improved or unimproved which lie within the district, and it may make and enforce necessary police and sanitary regulations in connection therewith.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 195, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------

6304.1.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any port district which has received, or is receiving, money pursuant to the provisions of Division 1 (commencing with Section 30) for the construction or improvement of a small craft harbor or facilities in connection therewith, may enter into a lease of any portion of its land and water area which has been freed from the public trust for commerce, navigation, or fisheries for the development of marine-oriented apartments and townhouses. Such lease may authorize the lessee to sublet individual dwelling units, but such lease shall not exceed a term of 50 years, after which time any improvements constructed pursuant to the lease shall revert to the district. Land rental units constructed pursuant to such lease shall be available to all persons on equal and reasonable terms. Any such lease shall contain express provisions requiring the lessee to provide for reasonable public access across the leased lands to adjacent port water areas.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to allow the use of tide or submerged lands in any manner inconsistent with the California Constitution or with the public trust for commerce, navigation, or fisheries.

Any lease of real property so freed from the public trust which is proposed to be let under the provisions of this section shall first be submitted to the State Lands Commission and to the Attorney General for review and approval, and no such lease shall be let unless the State Lands Commission and the Attorney General find that the proposed lease would be in the public interest and would not be in violation of any provision of the California Constitution or of any term of a grant of tidelands or submerged lands and would not be inconsistent with the public trust for commerce, navigation, or fisheries.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1972, Ch. 1383.)
-------------------------------------------

6305.

It may fix, regulate and collect the rates or charges for the use of wharves, warehouses, vessels, railroads and other facilities, structures and appliances owned, controlled or operated by it, in connection with or for the promotion and accommodation of transportation or navigation, and it may also fix, regulate and collect the rates or charges for pilotage and towage.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

6306.

It may lay out, plan and establish the general plan and system of harbor and harbor district improvements and modify the plan and prescribe the specifications for such improvements.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

6307.

It may perform the functions of warehousemen, stevedores, lighterers, reconditioners, shippers and reshippers of properties of all kinds.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

6308.

It may manage the business of the district and promote the maritime and commercial interests by proper advertisement of its advantages, and by the solicitation of business, within or without the district, within other States or in foreign countries, through such employees and agencies as are expedient.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

6309.

Except as otherwise provided in Section 660, the board may adopt all ordinances necessary for the regulation of the district with respect to the parking of vehicles, the speed and operation on vehicles and vessels, berthing of vessels, fire safety ashore and afloat, prohibiting the pumping of raw sewage or waste into port waters, and littering.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 878.)
-------------------------------------------

6309.2.

Before any ordinance may be adopted, the ordinance shall be published in its entirety on three separate occasions in a newspaper of general circulation published within the district, or if none, in any newspaper of general circulation published in the county in which the district, or a part thereof, is located, together with a notice of the date on which the board will meet for the purpose of adopting the ordinance. The first publication shall occur at least 20 days prior to the date of such meeting, and the second and third publications shall occur at seven-day intervals. The general public shall be allowed to appear at the meeting and be heard on the proposed ordinance. The ordinance shall become effective as provided in Section 9141 of the Elections Code, unless another effective date is set forth by the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 923, Sec. 112.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

6309.4.

Every person who violates any of the provisions of a district ordinance adopted pursuant to Sections 6309 and 6309.2 is guilty of an infraction and shall be subject to a fine not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1092, Sec. 143.   Effective September 27, 1983.   Operative January 1, 1984, by Sec. 427 of Ch. 1092.)
-------------------------------------------

6309.6.

The district’s manager, harbormaster or wharfinger, or any duly authorized representative of one of these persons, shall have the power to issue citations for violation of district ordinances in the manner provided by Chapter 5C (commencing with Section 853.5) of Title 3 of Part 2 of the Penal Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 579.)
-------------------------------------------

6310.

Notwithstanding the enumeration and specific statement herein of particular powers, the district may do and perform all acts and things necessary and appropriate to carry out the purposes of this part and the powers of the district.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

6311.

Upon a four-fifths vote of all the members of the board, it may issue negotiable promissory notes bearing interest at a rate of not exceeding 7 percent per annum; provided, however, that said notes shall be payable from revenues and taxes levied for purposes of the district other than the payment of principal and interest on any bonded debt of the district; and provided further, that the maturity shall not be later than 20 years from the date thereof and that the total aggregate amount of such notes outstanding at any one time shall not exceed 1 percent of the assessed valuation of the taxable property in the district, or if said assessed valuation is not obtainable, 1 percent of the county auditor’s estimate of the assessed valuation of the taxable property in the district evidenced by his certificate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1289.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Bonds [6330. - 6355.]



  ARTICLE 1. District Bonds [6330. - 6331.]

6330.

A district may create a bonded debt pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 43600) of Chapter 4 of Division 4 of Title 4 of the Government Code.

Bonds may be issued for the purpose of raising money for use in carrying out any of the powers and purposes of the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 101, Sec. 95.)
-------------------------------------------

6331.

Bonds issued by any district pursuant to this part are legal investments for all trust funds, and for the funds of all insurers, banks, both commercial and savings, and trust companies, and for the State school funds, and whenever any money or funds may, by law now or hereafter enacted, be invested in bonds of cities, cities and counties, counties, school districts or municipalities in this State, such money or funds may be invested in bonds of districts organized pursuant to this part.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Revenue Bonds [6340. - 6346.]

6340.

Pursuant to this article a district may create a revenue bond indebtedness for the acquisition and construction, or acquisition or construction of any improvements or property or facilities contained within its powers.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1958, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 70.)
-------------------------------------------

6341.

The issuance of said bonds shall be authorized by ordinance adopted by two-thirds of all the members of the board, to take effect upon its publication.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1958, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 70.)
-------------------------------------------

6342.

The secretary shall publish said ordinance once in a newspaper of general circulation printed in said district, and if there is none, then in such newspaper published in the county in which said district is located.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1958, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 70.)
-------------------------------------------

6343.

Said ordinance shall specify the total amount, denomination, method of maturity, and the rate or maximum rate of interest of said bonds, and in general terms, the acquisitions and improvements to be constructed thereby; and, in addition, shall contain such other and further provisions as in the judgment of the board are deemed advisable.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1958, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 70.)
-------------------------------------------

6344.

The proceeds of said bonds shall be placed in an account in the treasury of the district to be entitled ____ Port District Revenue Construction Fund No. ____ and used exclusively for the objects and purposes mentioned in the ordinance.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1958, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 70.)
-------------------------------------------

6345.

The lien of said bonds of the same issue shall be prior and superior to all revenue bonds subsequently issued.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1958, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 70.)
-------------------------------------------

6346.

Proceedings for the issuance of said bonds shall be had, the board shall have such powers and duties, and the bondholders shall have such rights and remedies, all in substantial accordance with and with like legal effect as provided in Sections 54344 to 54346, inclusive, 54347, 54348, 54350, 54351, 54352, and in Articles 4 (commencing at Section 54400) to 11 (commencing at Section 54660), inclusive, of Chapter 6, Part 1, Division 2, Title 5 of the Government Code. As used therein the word “resolution” shall mean ordinance, the word “local agency” shall mean district, and the words “legislative body” shall mean board.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1958, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 70.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2.5. Additional Stockton Port District Bonds [6350. - 6353.]

6350.

Pursuant to this article, the Stockton Port District may also create an additional bonded debt up to but not in excess of 3 percent of the assessed value of all taxable real and personal property within the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 859.)
-------------------------------------------

6350.1.

This bonded indebtedness may be created solely for the purpose of providing funds for the acquisition or construction of revenue-producing harbor improvements of a self-liquidating character.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 859.)
-------------------------------------------

6350.2.

All bonds issued pursuant to this article shall be authorized by ordinance passed by two-thirds of all of the members of the board concurred in by ordinance of the Stockton City Council. But an election need not be held within the district and it is unnecessary to secure the approval of the electors within the district for the issuance of bonds for the purposes and within the limitations of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 859.)
-------------------------------------------

6350.3.

The bonds shall be payable within 30 years from their date and shall mature serially at such times as may be fixed by the board, but the earliest maturity of the principal of the bonds shall be fixed at a date not more than 10 years from the date of issue.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 859.)
-------------------------------------------

6350.4.

The bonds may be issued in such denominations as the board determines, except that no bond shall be of a denomination less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor of a greater denomination than one thousand dollars ($1,000).

The bonds shall be payable on the day and at the place or places fixed in such bonds, with interest at the rate specified in the bonds, which rate shall not be in excess of 7 percent per annum of the face amount, payable annually or semiannually.

The board may provide for redemption of the bonds before maturity at prices and upon terms and conditions determined by it. A bond shall not be subject to call or redemption prior to maturity unless it contains a recital on its face to that effect.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 280.)
-------------------------------------------

6350.5.

If any officer whose signature or countersignature appears on the bonds or coupons ceases to be an officer before the delivery of the bonds to the purchaser, his signature or countersignature is nevertheless as valid and sufficient for all purposes as if he had remained in office.

The bonds may be issued and sold by the board for not less than their par value and accrued interest to date of delivery, at such time and under such conditions as may be designated by the board.

The proceeds shall be placed in the treasury of the district to the credit of the proper improvement fund and applied exclusively to the objects and purposes mentioned in the ordinance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 859.)
-------------------------------------------

6350.6.

The form of the bonds shall be prescribed by the board and they shall be signed by the officer or officers that the board designates. The coupons appertaining to the bonds shall be numbered consecutively and shall be signed by the facsimile signature of the officer or officers that the board has designated.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 859.)
-------------------------------------------

6350.7.

The income and revenue derived or to be realized from the harbor improvement acquired or to be acquired from the proceeds of the bonds shall be deposited in a special fund and kept separate and apart from all other revenues of the district. It shall be applied, firstly, to the creation of an interest fund, herein designated as “interest fund,” for the payment of the annual interest due or to become due upon the bonds during the next ensuing fiscal year and before the time for the fixing of the next general tax levy in the county in which the district is located.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 859.)
-------------------------------------------

6350.8.

The special fund shall be applied, secondly, to the creation of a sinking fund, herein designated as “sinking fund,” to provide for the payment of the principal of the bonds at or before their maturity date or dates.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 859.)
-------------------------------------------

6350.9.

Any additional revenues over and above the amounts required to be deposited in the interest fund and the sinking fund, may be deposited in an operation fund, herein designated as “operation fund,” to be applied to the costs of operation and maintenance, including reasonable repairs and depreciation, of the particular revenue-producing harbor improvement acquired by the issuance and sale of the bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 859.)
-------------------------------------------

6351.

Surplus revenues in the operation fund may be deposited either in the interest fund or the sinking fund, but money allocated to the interest fund or the sinking fund shall not be transferred to any other fund or used for any other purpose than the payment of the bonds and the interest thereon so long as the bonds are outstanding.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 859.)
-------------------------------------------

6351.5.

The board, in and by the ordinance authorizing the issuance of the bonds, shall hypothecate and allocate all of the revenues to be realized from the revenue-producing harbor improvement to be acquired or constructed from the proceeds of the bonds to the payment of both principal and interest.

The allocation and hypothecation is irrevocable until all bonds and the accrued interest thereon are paid.

The allocation and hypothecation shall be made in each case for the exclusive benefit of the bonds to be issued for the purpose of acquiring or constructing the particular revenue-producing harbor improvement, and as additional security for the payment of the principal and interest of the bonds.

But the allocation and hypothecation do not constitute the exclusive source of payment. The bonds constitute general obligations of the district and both principal and interest may be paid from any money or sources of revenue of any kind, including taxes, on hand and available for that purpose.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 859.)
-------------------------------------------

6352.

Whenever the revenues of the district are, or in the opinion of the board will be insufficient to provide for the payment in full of the principal or interest on the bonds, the board may, and if the revenues in the interest fund are insufficient to meet the next ensuing fiscal year’s interest on the bonds issued and then outstanding or if the moneys in the sinking fund are insufficient to pay or provide for the payment of any bonds maturing during the next ensuing fiscal year, it shall cause a tax to be levied and collected, upon all of the taxable property in the district, sufficient to meet all sums coming due for principal and interest on the bonds during the next ensuing fiscal year and before the time for fixing the next general tax levy in the county in which the district is located.

The tax shall be levied and collected annually in the manner provided by Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 6360) of this part, and shall be in addition to all other taxes authorized to be levied and collected. When collected, the tax shall not be used for any purpose other than the payment of the bonds and the accruing interest thereon.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 859.)
-------------------------------------------

6353.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares that because of the unique, complex problems existing with respect to the Stockton Port District, as a large inland port district, it is necessary that special legislation be enacted to authorize additional, limited financing provisions for said port district, and that a general law cannot be made applicable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 859.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. County and Municipal Bonds [6355. - 6355.]

6355.

Whenever, upon the creation of a district any municipality therein or any county in which the district is located which has theretofore authorized or incurred a bonded indebtedness for any work or improvement for which the district may incur a bonded debt pursuant to this part, and such municipality or such county thereafter sells such bonds or any portion thereof, the proceeds of the sale may, upon the order of the appropriate board of supervisors or city council, be paid by the custodian into the treasury of the district and shall be applied by the board, exclusively to the purposes and objects for which the bonds were authorized by the municipal corporation or the county issuing them.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Finances and Taxation [6360. - 6372.]



  ARTICLE 1. Levy, Assessment and Collection of Taxes [6360. - 6365.]

6360.

On or before June first of each year, the port director shall submit to the board a detailed statement of the money required for the ensuing fiscal year for the purpose of conducting the business of the district. There shall be submitted with such estimate, such data and schedules as the board may require.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

6361.

Annually, on or before the date set for the consideration of the budget by the board of supervisors of the county in which the district is located, the board of each district shall furnish to the board of supervisors of the county in which the district is situated, an estimate in writing of the amount of money needed for all purposes by the district during the ensuing fiscal year. Thereupon, it is the duty of the board of supervisors to levy a special tax, on all taxable property of the county lying within the district, sufficient in amount to raise that sum.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

6362.

The tax shall in no event exceed the rate of ten cents ($0.10) on each one hundred dollars ($100) of the assessed value of all taxable property within the district, exclusive of the amount necessary to be raised by taxes to meet bond and promissory note interest and redemption. The tax shall be computed, entered upon the tax rolls and collected in the same manner as county taxes are computed, entered and collected. All money collected shall be paid into the county treasury to the credit of the particular district fund and shall be paid to the treasurer of the district upon the order of the board of port commissioners.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1505.)
-------------------------------------------

6363.

From the time of the organization of any district until the next succeeding July first, the district may incur indebtedness for the purpose of operating the port and in the first tax levy, the rate shall be in an amount sufficient to operate the port for the first full fiscal year as well as to pay the obligations thus incurred before the first of the July succeeding the creation of the district.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

6364.

A district may impose a special tax pursuant to Article 3.5 (commencing with Section 50075) of Chapter 1 of Part 1 of Division 1 of Title 5 of the Government Code. The special taxes shall be applied uniformly to all taxpayers or all real property within the district, except that unimproved property may be taxed at a lower rate than improved property.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 70, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

6365.

(a) The district may, in any year, levy assessments, reassessments, or special taxes and issue bonds to finance waterway construction projects and related operations and maintenance, or operations and maintenance projects independent of construction projects in accordance with, and pursuant to, the Improvement Act of 1911 (Division 7 (commencing with Section 5000) of the Streets and Highways Code), the Improvement Bond Act of 1915 (Division 10 (commencing with Section 8500) of the Streets and Highways Code), the Municipal Improvement Act of 1913 (Division 12 (commencing with Section 10000) of the Streets and Highways Code), the Benefit Assessment Act of 1982 (Chapter 6.4 (commencing with Section 54703) of the Government Code), the Integrated Financing District Act (Chapter 1.5 (commencing with Section 53175) of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code), the Mello-Roos Community Facilities Act of 1982 (Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 53311) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code), and the Marks-Roos Local Bond Pooling Act of 1985 (Article 4 (commencing with Section 6584) of Chapter 5 of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code).

(b) Sections 5116, 5117, 5118, 5119, 5190, 5191, 5192, 5193, 10104, and 10302 of the Streets and Highways Code shall not apply to assessment proceedings undertaken pursuant to this section. 

(c) Notwithstanding the related provisions of any assessment act which the district is authorized to use, any assessment diagram which any of those acts requires to be prepared prior to final approval of the assessment district may show only the exterior boundaries of the assessment district and the boundaries of any assessment zones or improvement areas within the district. The diagram may refer to the county assessor’s maps and records for a detailed description of each lot or parcel. 

(d) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the district may levy and collect assessments and reassessments in the same manner as provided in Article 3 (commencing with Section 51320) of Chapter 2 of Part 7 of Division 15 of the Water Code, to pay any or all of the following: 

(1) For the operation and maintenance of projects, including maintenance of lands, easements, rights-of-way, dredge material disposal areas, and remediation. 

(2) For the satisfaction of liabilities arising from projects.

(3) To accumulate a fund which may be used to advance the cost of district projects, provided that the advances be repaid, with interest as determined by the commissioners, from assessments, reassessments, special taxes, or fees charged by the district pursuant to this section. 

(4) To acquire real property, easements, or rights-of-way for a navigation project or the maintenance of a navigation project. 

(5) To acquire real property within the district for disposal of dredged material. 

(e) For purposes of this section, functions designated by Article 3 (commencing with Section 51320) of Chapter 2 of Part 7 of Division 15 of the Water Code to be performed by the board of supervisors, the board of trustees, or valuation commissioners shall be performed by the district’s board. 

(f) For purposes of this section, the board may order the creation of a separate assessment roll to pay the allowable expenses of any single project or any group or system of projects. 

(g) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, all assessments, reassessments, and taxes levied by the district may be collected together with, and not separately from, taxes for county purposes. Any county in which the district is located may collect, at the request of the district, all assessments, reassessments, and special taxes levied by the district and shall cause those revenues to be deposited into the county treasury to the credit of the district. Each county may deduct its reasonable collection and administrative costs. 

(h) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any assessment or reassessment levied pursuant to this section may be apportioned on the basis of land use category, tonnage shipped on the waterway, size and type of vessel using the waterway, front footage, acreage, capital improvements, or other reasonable basis, separately or in combination, as determined by the district commissioners. 

(i) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, Division 4 (commencing with Section 2800) of the Streets and Highways Code shall not apply to any assessment levied by the district. 

(j) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no bond issued pursuant to this section shall be used to fund the routine maintenance dredging of channels.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 978, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Claims and Demands [6370. - 6372.]

6370.

All claims for money or damages against the district are governed by Part 3 (commencing with Section 900) and Part 4 (commencing with Section 940) of Division 3.6 of Title 1 of the Government Code except as provided therein, or by other statutes or regulations expressly applicable thereto. All claims not governed thereby shall be filed with the auditor on forms and blanks prescribed by him. A claim shall not be paid without the endorsement of the auditor certifying to its correctness.

The auditor shall keep a record, which shall be a public record, of all claims against the district showing by whom made, for what purpose, the amount thereof and when paid.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1715.)
-------------------------------------------

6371.

If there is not sufficient money in any fund to pay the demands made against it, the demand shall be registered in a book kept by the treasurer, showing its number, when presented, date, amount, name of payee, and on what account allowed and out of what fund payable, and when so registered, the demand shall be returned to the person presenting it with the endorsement of the word “Registered” dated and signed by the treasurer. All registered demands are payable in the order of their registration.

This section does not prevent the payment by the treasurer of bonds of the district or of any city or county, and interest coupons thereof, in accordance with the Constitution of this State and the provisions of this part authorizing the issuance and payment of such bonds.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

6372.

Wages and salaries shall be paid at such intervals as the board may direct, but at least once each month.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 6. RIVER PORT DISTRICTS [6800. - 6963.]



  General Provisions

6800.

“District,” as used in this part, means any river port district formed pursuant to this part.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

6801.

“Board,” as used in this part, means the port commission described in Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 6830).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 454, Sec. 91.)
-------------------------------------------

6802.

This part does not repeal, modify, or otherwise affect the provisions of any other law relating to port or harbor districts, and no other law providing for the creation of port or harbor districts repeals, modifies or otherwise affects this part or any of its provisions.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

6803.

Any property owned by any city which is used or held for the purpose of aiding or developing navigation, commerce, or fishing may be transferred to the district to be used for the same purposes, and any land of the State, which may have been transferred to any such city, may be transferred to the district subject to the trusts and other provisions providing for the transfer of lands from the State to the city. A city which is governed by a freeholders charter may only transfer or turn over such property if authorized so to do by the provisons of its charter or by amendment thereof.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

6804.

If any land under a navigable stream, is by virtue of any work or improvement by the United states or the State, freed from the easement of navigation and fishing, it reverts to the district, to be used for the purposes and objects for which the district was organized. If the lands are not used or held for these purposes, they revert to the State.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

6805.

If a district is dissolved, all land granted to it by a municipal corporation, reverts to and is revested in the municipal corporation granting it to the district.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 1. Formation [6810. - 6812.]



  ARTICLE 1. Petition and Hearing [6810. - 6812.]

6810.

A district may be organized pursuant to this part. A district may include any contiguous territory in one or more counties, contiguous to a navigable river or to any channel connected with a navigable river, but a municipal corporation shall not be divided in the formation of a district, and territory situated in a county in which there is located a duly organized and existing port district, created pursuant to Part IV of this division, may not be included. Territory situated within the boundaries of any port or harbor district, organized or designated and existing under the provisions of any city charter, shall not be included. Any territory, annexed to a municipal corporation, which is in a district, becomes a part of the district.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

6811.

Whenever the formation of a district is desired, a petition may be presented at a regular meeting of the board of supervisors of each county in which is located any portion of land within the proposed district. The petition may consist of any number of instruments and shall be signed by not less than five per cent of the registered voters residing within the district, who voted at the last preceding general election at which a Governor was elected. The original petition need not be filed with the board of supervisors of each county, but a certified copy of the original shall be filed.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

6812.

The provisions of Chapters I and II of Division I of the District Organization Act shall govern and control the proceedings for the filing and hearing of the petition and the proceedings for final hearing of the petition and the formation of the district. The “supervising authority” as used in the District Organization Act means the board of supervisors of each county in which is located any portion of land within the proposed district.

All proceedings necessary for the formation of the district, as provided in Chapters I and II of Division I of the District Organization Act, shall be had in each county in which is located any portion of land within the proposed district. Land lying within any county within the proposed district shall not be included unless a majority of the electors in that portion of the district within the county vote in favor thereof.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Port Commission [6830. - 6869.]



  ARTICLE 1. Administrative Provisions [6830. - 6844.]

6830.

The district shall be governed by a port commission, which consists of five members. Two commissioners shall be appointed by the board of supervisors of the county in which is located the largest proportion in value of the lands within the district. Two commissioners shall be appointed by the governing body of the municipal corporation, having the largest proportion in value of lands within the district. One commissioner shall be appointed by joint action of the boards of supervisors of any other counties located in the district.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

6830.1.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 6830, the Sacramento-Yolo Port Commission shall be composed of five members selected and appointed as follows:

(1) Four commissioners shall be appointed by the City Council of the City of West Sacramento, which commissioners may be members of the city council, and notwithstanding Section 6835, shall be residents of the City of West Sacramento. The appointments shall be made in the manner set by law for appointments by the City of West Sacramento.

(2) One commissioner shall be appointed by the Board of Supervisors of Yolo County, which commissioner may be a member
 of the board of supervisors and, notwithstanding Section 6835, shall be a resident of the City of West Sacramento. The appointment shall be made in the manner set by law for appointments by the County of Yolo.

(b) The term of the members appointed pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be four years from the date of appointment. Commission members shall serve at the pleasure of the appointing authority and the appointing authority may replace a member prior to the end of the term in the manner set by law for appointments by the appointing authority.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 114, Sec. 1.   (AB 1226)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

6830.2.

The boundaries of the Sacramento-Yolo Port District are hereby established to coincide with the first supervisorial district of the County of Yolo, as of October 1, 2005. The boundaries also shall include all property owned by the Sacramento-Yolo Port District in Solano County that was incorporated into the district by the Sacramento County Local Agency Formation Commission on May 29, 1992.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 284, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2007.)